Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.68.040

Trading in public office.

(1) A person is guilty of trading in public office if:

(a) He or she offers, confers, or agrees to confer any pecuniary benefit upon a public servant pursuant to an agreement or understanding that such actor will or may be appointed to a public office; or

(b) Being a public servant, he or she requests, accepts, or agrees to accept any pecuniary benefit from another person pursuant to an agreement or understanding that such person will or may be appointed to a public office.

(2) Trading in public office is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 389; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.68.040.]